Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 1. Lien on Personal Property

38-20-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Customer” means any person who:

Hires a molder to fabricate, cast, or otherwise prepare a die, tool, mold, form, or pattern for the purpose of manufacturing, assembling, casting, fabricating, or otherwise making a product; or

Provides a molder with a die, tool, mold, form, or pattern for the purpose of manufacturing, assembling, casting, fabricating, or otherwise making a product.

“Mold” means a die, tool, mold, form, or pattern.

“Molder” means any person who fabricates, casts, or otherwise prepares or uses a die, tool, mold, form, or pattern for the purpose of manufacturing, assembling, casting, fabricating, or otherwise preparing a product. “Molder” includes, but is not limited to, a tool or die maker. A molder shall not be deemed to be a warehouse as defined in section 4-7-102 (a)13, C.R.S.

(3.5)

“Pet animals” means dogs, cats, or other domestic animals, except livestock as defined in section 38-20-202 (6).

“Rent temporary shelter” or “rent temporary trailer space” means shelter or trailer space that is rented for a fee for a period of time not exceeding one month, but excluding month to month tenancies that have been in effect at least four months.

History.

Source:
L. 71:

P. 951, § 3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-15.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 363, § 1, effective September 30.

L. 2005:

(3.5) added, p. 637, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 505, § 56, effective September 1.

38-20-102.
Lien for care and feeding of pet animals - landlord.

Any feeder, veterinarian, or other person to whom pet animals are entrusted for the purpose of feeding, keeping, boarding, or medical care shall have a lien, which shall be superior to all other liens, upon such pet animals for the amount that may be due for such feeding, keeping, boarding, or medical care and for all costs incurred in enforcing such lien.

If the lienholder complies with the provisions of section 38-20-103 and the pet animals referred to in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) are sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of to another from the premises of the lienholder by anyone other than the lienholder acting on his or her own behalf, the lien created by this subsection (1) shall continue and attach to the proceeds received or receivable therefrom. This lien shall also be superior to all other liens.

The keeper of any hotel, motel, inn, or boardinghouse or any other person who rents temporary shelter to transient guests shall have a lien upon the personal property of such transient guests found upon the premises for the amount that may be due for lodging and boarding services rendered and for all costs incurred in enforcing such lien, and such liens shall apply to the personal property of transient guests who rent temporary trailer space in any trailer court or auto court in this state. The provisions of this section shall not apply to motor vehicles owned by such transient guests parked on the premises of such hotel, motel, inn, or boardinghouse or to stolen property.

Any person who rents furnished or unfurnished rooms or apartments for the housekeeping purposes of his tenants, as well as the keeper of a trailer court who rents trailer space, shall have a lien upon the tenant’s personal property that is then on or in the rental premises. The value of the lien shall be for the amount of unpaid board, lodging, or rent, and for reasonable costs incurred in enforcing the lien, not including attorney fees. The lien shall be upon the household furniture, goods, appliances, and other personal property of the tenant and members of his household then being upon the rental premises, but exclusive of small kitchen appliances, cooking utensils, beds, bedding, necessary wearing apparel, personal or business records and documents, and the personal effects of the tenant and the members of his household.

In the event the tenant has vacated the premises, the landlord shall allow the tenant and members of his household access to the premises at any reasonable time and in a reasonable manner to remove any property not covered by the lien.

In the event the tenant has not vacated the premises, the landlord or his agent may enter upon the premises at any reasonable time for the purpose of asserting the lien and, in a reasonable manner and peaceably, the landlord may assert dominion over the personal property covered by the lien. Assertion of the lien provided in this section in a manner which substantially interferes with the tenant’s right to reasonably occupy and enjoy the premises is unlawful and shall cause forfeiture of the lien and shall give rise to an action for damages.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 237, § 1.

G.S.

§ 2118.

R.S. 08:

§ 4013.

C.L.

§ 6428.

L. 29:

P. 440, § 1.

CSA:

C. 101, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-1.

L. 61:

P. 512, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-1.

L. 71:

P. 949, § 1.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1709, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 637, § 2, effective May 27.

38-20-103.
Pet animal contract to be filed.

All contracts, or copies thereof, made by the owner of any pet animal with any other person, including a feeder, for the caring for the same for pay, or on shares, or in any other manner may be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county where the owners or either of them reside, if they reside in the state, and, if the owners or either of them do not reside in the state, the copies may be filed with the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the contract was made. When such copies are so filed they shall be notice to everyone of the contents of such contracts and of the legal effect thereof.

History.

Source: L. 1887:

P. 417, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 6381.

C.L.

§ 6429.

CSA:

C. 101, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-2.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1709, § 2, effective May 18.

L. 2005:

Entire section amended, p. 638, § 3, effective May 27.

38-20-104.
Landlord to retain property - sale. (Repealed)

History.

Source:
L. 1889:

P. 188, § 4.

R.S. 08:

§ 3006.

C.L.

§ 6430.

L. 29:

P. 441, § 2.

CSA:

C. 101, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-3.

L. 71:

P. 950, § 2.

L. 75:

Entire section repealed, p. 1419, § 9, effective April 24.

38-20-105.
Lien of common carrier.

Every common carrier of goods or passengers who, at the request of the owner of any personal goods, carries, conveys, or transports the same from one place to another and every other person who safely keeps or stores any personal property at the request of the owner or person lawfully in possession thereof shall have a lien upon all such personal property for his reasonable charges for the transportation, storage, or keeping thereof and for all reasonable and proper advances made thereon by him, in accordance with the usage and custom of common carriers and warehousemen.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 237, § 2.

G.S.

§ 2119.

R.S. 08:

§ 4014.

C.L.

§ 6431.

CSA:

C. 101, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-4.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 314, § 68, effective May 20.

38-20-106.
Lien for labor.

Any mechanic or other person who makes, alters, repairs, or bestows labor upon any article of personal property, at the request of the owner of such personal property or his agent shall have a lien upon such property for the amount due for such labor done or material furnished and for all costs incurred in enforcing such lien.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 237, § 3.

G.S.

§ 2120.

L. 1889:

P. 233, § 2.

R.S. 08:

§ 4015.

C.L.

§ 6432.

CSA:

C. 101, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-5.

38-20-106.2.
Molders’ liens - creation - notice.

A molders’ lien shall attach to all of a customer’s molds in a molder’s possession for which a balance is due from such customer for any manufacturing or fabrication work performed and materials furnished. A molders’ lien shall be for the amount due for any such work performed or materials furnished, including interest at the rate specified in section 38-22-101 (5), unless otherwise agreed, and for all costs incurred in enforcing such lien, including attorney fees if specified by contract. The amount of such lien shall be determined by the value of any such manufacturing or fabrication work performed and material furnished unless the cost of such work and materials is otherwise specified by contract. A molder may retain possession of a mold until all charges are paid for such lien, unless a claim is made to such mold by the holder of a prior lien or by the holder of a lien of public record.

A molders’ lien created pursuant to this section shall be considered a security interest for the purposes of section 18-5-206, C.R.S.

No lien created by this section shall have priority over a lien of public record, including a lien filed pursuant to title 4, C.R.S., regardless of when the financing statement or notice of lien was filed or recorded.

History.

Source:
L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 364, § 2, effective September 30.

38-20-106.5.
Motor vehicle repair garages - restoration of liens.

A motor vehicle repair garage which is entitled to a lien under section 38-20-106 for motor vehicle repairs and which has released the motor vehicle upon receipt of payment for such repairs in the form of a check, draft, or order for the payment of money upon any bank, depository, person, firm, or corporation shall be entitled to the restoration of the lien if the check, draft, or order is not honored for full payment or is dishonored upon its presentment and if the maker, issuer, or drawer fails, within twelve days after receiving notice from the motor vehicle repair garage of nonpayment or dishonor, to pay the check, draft, or order. In the event such motor vehicle repair garage has released the motor vehicle upon an open account, the motor vehicle repair garage shall be entitled to restoration of the lien if the total amount as agreed upon by the parties is not paid when due as agreed upon by the parties and if the debtor fails, within twelve days after receiving notice from the motor vehicle repair garage of nonpayment, to pay the amount due. Restoration of such lien shall entitle the motor vehicle repair garage to regain possession of the motor vehicle. In regaining possession, the motor vehicle repair garage may proceed without judicial process if this can be done without breach of the peace or may proceed by action.

“Notice”, as used in subsection (1) of this section, means notice given to the person entitled thereto, either in person or in writing. Such notice in writing shall be conclusively presumed to have been given when deposited by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested and postage prepaid, in the United States mail and addressed to such person at his address as it appears on the invoice or such check, draft, or order or, in the case of an open account, as it appears on the account records of the motor vehicle repair garage. Any notice regarding an open account may only be given subsequent to nonpayment.

History.

Source:
L. 77:

Entire section added, p. 1924, § 2, effective January 1, 1978.

L. 81:

Entire section amended, p. 1820, § 1, effective July 1.

38-20-107.
Commencement of foreclosure action.

If any such charges for which a lien is given by section 38-20-102, 38-20-105, 38-20-106, or 38-20-106.2 or for which a lien is restored by section 38-20-106.5 are not paid within thirty days after the same become due and payable, the mechanic, innkeeper, or other person to whom such lien is given may file a foreclosure action in the county or district court of the county or city and county in which the contract or agreement between the lienholder and the owner of the property was signed or entered into, in which the owner resided at the time the contract or agreement was entered into, in which the owner resides at the time the foreclosure action is commenced or in which the work was performed, or, in the case of a lien created pursuant to section 38-20-106.2, in which any work was performed or materials were furnished. In the event that the lienholder does not foreclose the lien by commencing a judicial action within sixty days and if, under section 38-20-106, within ninety days after charges become due and payable, the lien shall terminate. However, such period of limitation may be extended by agreement between the parties for an additional period not to exceed thirty days. For the purposes of this subsection (1), if the contract between the owner and the lienholder provides for installment or continuing payments, installments or continuing payments shall be deemed to be due after default of any installment or payment or at the time the final installment or payment is due and payable at the option of the lienholder.

If the lienholder sells or otherwise disposes of the property of the owner without substantially complying with this article, the owner is entitled to recover from the lienholder the value of the property, but in no event less than one hundred dollars, and reasonable attorney fees.

Nothing in this article shall require a lienholder to commence a judicial action to foreclose his lien if the property held is abandoned as defined in section 38-20-116.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 238, § 4.

G.S.

§ 2121.

R.S. 08:

§ 4016.

C.L.

§ 6433.

CSA:

C. 101, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-6.

L. 64:

P. 289, § 222.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1416, § 1, effective April 24.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1710, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 1821, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1583, § 44, effective July 10.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 364, § 3, effective September 30.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 638, § 4, effective May 27.

38-20-108.
Foreclosure action - procedure.

In any foreclosure action, the lienholder or the lienholder’s attorney, by complaint, shall show to the court the following:

That the lienholder did perform a specified service for the defendant which entitles such lienholder to a lien on personal property owned by the defendant pursuant to the provisions of section 38-20-102, 38-20-105, 38-20-106, or 38-20-106.2;

That said service was performed at the request of the defendant or his agent;

A particular description of the property upon which the lien is claimed and a statement of its actual value;

That the defendant has failed to pay charges within thirty days after the same became due and payable;

That notice of demand for charges has been given to the owner personally or by registered mail at the owner’s last-known address;

An itemized description of the charges for labor performed and parts replaced if a lien is claimed under section 38-20-106;

An itemized description of the charges for any work performed and materials furnished, including interest at the rate specified in section 38-22-101 (5), unless otherwise agreed, and for all costs incurred in enforcing such lien, including attorney fees if specified by contract if a lien is claimed under section 38-20-106.2.

Upon filing the complaint, the clerk of the court shall issue a summons as in other cases; except that it shall command the defendant to appear before the court at a place named in such summons and at a time and on a day which shall be not less than three nor more than five days from the day of issuing the same to answer the complaint of plaintiff. The summons shall also contain a statement addressed to the defendant stating: “If you fail to file with the court, at or before the time for appearance specified in the summons, an answer to the complaint, denying or admitting all of the material allegations of the complaint, judgment by default may be taken against you for the lien charges described in the complaint, for costs as provided in this article, and for any other relief to which the plaintiff is entitled.”

If either party requests a delay in trial longer than five days, the court, in its discretion, upon good cause shown, may require either of the parties to give bond in an amount to be fixed by the court for the payment to the opposing party of such amount as he may be entitled to due to the delay. The bond shall be secured by two or more sureties, by one corporate surety authorized to do business in this state, or by cash bond, to be approved by the court.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 238, § 5.

G.S.

§ 2122.

R.S. 08:

§ 4017.

C.L.

§ 6434.

CSA:

C. 101, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-7.

L. 64:

P. 289, § 223.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1417, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 77:

(2) R&RE, p. 1710, § 4, effective May 18.

L. 98:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended and (1)(g) added, p. 365, § 4, effective September 30.

38-20-109.
Lienor may sell - procedure.

When the lienor has received a judgment and after giving ten days’ prior notice of the time and place of such sale, with a description of the property to be sold, by one publication in some newspaper published in the county wherein he or she resides or, if there is no such newspaper, by posting in three public places within such county and after delivering to the owner of such personal property or, if he or she does not reside in the county, transmitting by mail to him or her at his or her usual place of abode, if known, a copy of such notice, he or she may proceed to sell all such personal property, or so much thereof as may be necessary, at public auction, for cash in hand, at any public place within such county between the hours of 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. of the day appointed. From the proceeds thereof he or she may pay the reasonable costs of such foreclosure, notice, and sale and any necessary and reasonable charges for the preserving, maintaining, feeding, boarding, or caring for the property on which he or she has a lien, together with the reasonable cost of keeping such property up to the time of sale, but the reasonable costs of keeping such property up to the time of sale shall not exceed ninety dollars. He or she shall render the residue of the proceeds and of the property unsold to the owner.

Where property upon which the lien is being foreclosed is in danger of serious and immediate decay or waste or is likely to depreciate rapidly in value pending the determination of the issue or where the keeping of it will be attended with great expense, the lienholder, as plaintiff to the action, may apply to the court, upon due notice as the court may direct, for a sale thereof; and, thereupon, the court in its discretion may order the property sold in the manner provided for in said order, and the proceeds of said sale shall be deposited with the clerk of the court to abide the further order of the court. Upon application for such order for sale, the court in its discretion, upon good cause shown, may require the plaintiff to give bond in an amount to be fixed by the court for the payment to the defendant of such amount as the defendant may be entitled to for damages sustained by the defendant in the event of wrongful foreclosure. The bond shall be secured by two or more sureties, by one corporate surety authorized to do business in this state, or by cash bond, to be approved by the court.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 238, § 6.

G.S.

§ 2123.

R.S. 08:

§ 4018.

C.L.

§ 6435.

CSA:

C. 101, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-8.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1417, § 3, effective April 24.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1710, § 5, effective May 18.

L. 2005:

(1) amended, p. 638, § 5, effective May 27.

38-20-110.
Sale void, when. (Repealed)

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 239, § 7.

G.S.:

§ 2124.

R.S. 08:

§ 4019.

C.L.

§ 6436.

CSA:

C. 101, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-9.

L. 75:

Entire section repealed, p. 1419, § 9, effective April 24.

38-20-111.
Lienor may purchase.

At such sale the person to whom such lien is given may become the purchaser.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 239, § 8.

G.S.

§ 2125.

R.S. 08:

§ 4020.

C.L.

§ 6437.

CSA:

C. 101, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-10.

38-20-112.
Sale continued - when - record.

In any case where the property to be sold cannot conveniently be sold in one day, the sale may be continued from day to day at the place of sale. Upon the completion of such sale, the person to whom the lien is given shall cause a bill of sale thereof to be filed with the court in which judgment was taken, in which shall be set down the sum for which each separate article of property was sold and the name of the purchaser. The court shall record such bill of sale in its docket and preserve the original thereof.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 239, § 9.

G.S.

§ 2126.

R.S. 08:

§ 4021.

C.L.

§ 6438.

CSA:

C. 101, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-11.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-11.

L. 64:

P. 289, § 224.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1418, § 4, effective April 24.

38-20-113.
Lien no bar to suit for charges.

Nothing in this article shall take away the right of action of the party to whom such lien is given to satisfy his judgment pursuant to law and the Colorado rules of civil procedure for his charges or for any residue thereof after sale of such property.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 239, § 10.

G.S.

§ 2127.

R.S. 08:

§ 4022.

C.L.

§ 6439.

CSA:

C. 101, § 12.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-12.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-12.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 1418, § 5, effective April 24.

38-20-114.
Clerk of sale.

At such sale the person to whom such lien is given may appoint a clerk and crier.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 239, § 11.

G.S.

§ 2128.

R.S. 08:

§ 4023.

C.L.

§ 6440.

CSA:

C. 101, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-13.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-13.

38-20-115.
Sale fees.

Clerks of the county or district court may charge for recording each bill of sale a fee as authorized by section 13-32-104, C.R.S.

History.

Source: L. 1883:

P. 239, § 12.

G.S.

§ 2129.

R.S. 08:

§ 4024.

C.L.

§ 6411.

CSA:

C. 6441, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 86-1-14.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 86-1-14.

L. 64:

P. 290, § 225.

L. 75:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1418, § 6, effective April 24.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 1583, § 45, effective July 10.

38-20-116.
Abandoned property - notice of sale - definitions.

Property is presumed to be abandoned if the owner has failed to contact the lienholder for a period of not less than thirty days and the lienholder, in good faith, is without knowledge of any evidence indicating that the owner does not intend to abandon the property.

At least fifteen days prior to selling or otherwise disposing of abandoned property, the lienholder shall notify the owner of the proposed manner and date of disposition by transmitting said notice to the owner’s last known address by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, signed by the addressee only. The lienholder shall maintain in his records for a period of one year a copy of said notice together with the return receipt signed by the addressee, or, if said notice is returned unclaimed, said notice and the proof of return unclaimed shall be so maintained. If the written notice is returned unclaimed, the lienholder shall publish said notice at least one day in a newspaper in the county in which the property is located or, if no newspaper is published in that county, then a newspaper in some adjoining county.

(2.5)

The provisions of this subsection (2.5) shall apply to abandoned motor vehicles at repair shops.

For purposes of this subsection (2.5), unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandoned motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle:

That has been left at a repair shop by the motor vehicle’s owner, the owner’s agent, or an operator hired by the owner or owner’s agent;

That the repair shop has offered to repair and for which the repair shop has prepared an estimate of repair costs;

That the owner or the owner’s agent has refused to authorize repairs to, has refused to remove from the repair shop upon request, or has refused to pay for authorized and completed repairs to the vehicle. If a repair shop is unable, despite good faith efforts, to obtain a response from the owner or the owner’s agent regarding the authorization of repairs, payment for authorized and completed repairs, or the removal of a motor vehicle, the owner or owner’s agent shall be deemed to have refused to grant authorization, make payment, or remove the motor vehicle five working days following the repair shop’s last good faith effort to contact the owner or owner’s agent.

That is not the subject of sale negotiations or a sale agreement between the owner or the owner’s agent and the repair shop.

“Department” means the department of revenue.

“Division” means the division of motor vehicles in the department.

“Lienholder” means a person who holds a security interest in a motor vehicle under article 9 of title 4, C.R.S. For purposes of this subsection (2.5) only, “lienholder” shall not refer to the holder of a lien established pursuant to section 38-20-106.

If a repair shop seeks to obtain a certificate of title for an abandoned motor vehicle for purposes of selling such vehicle, a repair shop, or where practicable, its agent, shall:

At least fifteen days after the vehicle becomes an abandoned motor vehicle, establish the retail fair market value of the vehicle either by reference to sources generally accepted within the insurance industry, including price guide books and computerized valuation services, or by seeking a Colorado licensed automobile dealer or certified appraisal;

Have the abandoned motor vehicle inspected and a verification of vehicle identification number completed by a peace officer certified pursuant to section 42-5-206, C.R.S. Such inspection shall not be over one year old when the repair shop or its agent seeks to obtain a certificate of title to the abandoned motor vehicle.

If the verification of the vehicle identification number reveals that the vehicle is stolen, the peace officer completing the verification shall recover and secure the motor vehicle and notify its rightful owner.

Request a Colorado title record search of the vehicle identification number of the abandoned motor vehicle from the division or check the electronic system implemented by the department as required in section 42-4-2103 (3)(c)(III), C.R.S., to obtain correct information relating to any owner and lienholder of the abandoned motor vehicle as represented in the department records. In addition to requesting a Colorado title record search, if the abandoned motor vehicle is an out-of-state vehicle, the repair shop or its agent shall request a title and lien search from the other state.

Use the information provided through the Colorado title record search or out-of-state title and lien search to notify by certified mail the owner of record, including an out-of-state owner of record, and all lienholders of its possession of the abandoned motor vehicle. The notice shall specify the location of the repair shop and that, unless claimed within thirty calendar days after the date the notice was sent, as determined from the postmark on the notice, the motor vehicle is subject to sale. The repair shop or its agent shall keep the proof of notification on file for three years from the date of mailing.

Purchase a surety bond for twice the retail fair market value of the abandoned motor vehicle as established under subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c);

Write a statement under penalty of perjury that includes the following information:

That the repair shop or its agent notified the owner and any lienholders of the abandoned motor vehicle as required in subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c) and that neither the owner nor any lienholder has attempted to claim the abandoned motor vehicle within the time prescribed in subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c);

The business name and address of the repair shop;

The year, make, model, and vehicle identification number of the abandoned motor vehicle;

The date the abandoned motor vehicle was left at the repair shop;

The name of the person who left the abandoned motor vehicle at the repair shop. The repair shop or its agent shall provide a copy of any estimate as defined in section 42-9-102 (1.5), C.R.S., or work order as defined in section 42-9-102 (6), C.R.S. If the parties entered into an oral agreement, the repair shop shall provide the record of such communication as specified in section 42-9-104 (1)(c), C.R.S.

Whether the abandoned motor vehicle is roadworthy as defined in section 42-6-102 (15), C.R.S.; and

Not less than thirty days after the postmarked date of the notice mailed pursuant to subparagraph (IV) of this paragraph (c), present documentation of the requirements specified in subparagraphs (I) to (VI) of this paragraph (c) to the county motor vehicle office in the county in which the repair shop is located and apply for a certificate of title for the abandoned motor vehicle.

If the retail fair market value of the abandoned motor vehicle is less than two hundred dollars, the sale shall be made only for the purpose of junking, scrapping, or dismantling the motor vehicle, and the purchaser thereof shall not, under any circumstances, be entitled to a certificate of title. The repair shop shall cause to be executed and delivered to the person purchasing the motor vehicle a bill of sale. The bill of sale shall state that the purchaser acquires no right to a certificate of title for such vehicle. The repair shop shall promptly submit together to the department a report of sale and a copy of the bill of sale and shall also deliver a copy of the report of sale to the purchaser of the motor vehicle. Upon receipt of any report of sale with supporting documents on any sale made pursuant to this sub-subparagraph (B), the department shall purge the records for the vehicle as provided in section 42-4-2109 (1)(b) and shall not issue a new certificate of title for the vehicle. Any certificate of title issued in violation of this sub-subparagraph (B) shall be void.

After the repair shop or its agent has obtained a certificate of title for the abandoned motor vehicle as specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (2.5), the repair shop or its agent shall sell the motor vehicle in a commercially reasonable manner at a public or private sale.

Nothing in this subsection (2.5)(d) requires a repair shop to be a licensed dealer pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 for purposes of selling a motor vehicle pursuant to this section.

The department may promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. or create department-approved forms as may be appropriate to satisfy the requirements of this subsection (2.5).

The following provisions shall apply to molds, as defined in section 38-20-101:

In the absence of an agreement to the contrary, a customer shall have all rights and title to any mold in the possession of a molder that was used to perform work for such customer; except that, if a customer has not claimed possession of a mold within three years following its last prior use, such mold shall be presumed to be abandoned by the customer and all rights and title to such mold shall be transferred to the molder who shall destroy or otherwise dispose of such mold as abandoned property in accordance with this section. For purposes of this subsection (3), “within three years following its last prior use” means any period following the last prior use of the mold and includes periods preceding September 30, 1998.

Any molder who desires to have all rights and title to a mold shall send written notice to the customer’s last-known address by registered or certified mail return receipt requested, signed by the addressee only. If the written notice is returned unclaimed, the molder shall publish said notice at least one day in a newspaper of general circulation in the area in which the mold is located. Such written notice shall clearly indicate that the molder intends to terminate the customer’s rights and title to the mold described in such notice and shall include a recitation of the customer’s rights, as set forth in this section.

If a customer does not respond to the written notice sent pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a) within one hundred twenty days after the date of such notice to claim possession of the mold or does not make other contractual arrangements with the molder for storage of such mold, all rights and title of the customer to such mold shall transfer to the molder. Such molder may then destroy or otherwise dispose of the mold without risk of liability to the customer.

The molder shall maintain in such molder’s records for a period of one year a copy of the notice sent pursuant to subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (a), together with the return receipt signed by the addressee, or, if said notice is returned unclaimed, said notice and the proof of return unclaimed shall be so maintained.

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall require a molder to commence a judicial action to foreclose on a molders’ lien if such mold is abandoned, as such term is defined in this section, and nothing in this subsection (3) shall be interpreted to eliminate any right of action a molder may have against a customer for unpaid charges, damages, costs, or attorney fees, if provided for by contract.

History.

Source:
L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 1418, § 7, effective April 24.

L. 98:

(3) added, p. 365, § 5, effective September 30.

L. 2008:

(2.5) added, p. 539, § 1, effective January 1, 2009.

L. 2009:

(2.5)(c)(III) amended, (HB 09-1322), ch. 317, p. 1706, § 1, effective June 1; (2.5)(a) and IP(2.5)(b) amended, (SB 09-292), ch. 369, p. 1980, § 113, effective August 5.

L. 2017:

(2.5)(d)(II) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2065, § 47, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(2.5)(d)(II) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 140, § 12, effective October 1.